Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.010

Scope of definitions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Words and phrases as defined in this chapter, wherever used in this title, shall have the meaning as in this chapter ascribed to them, unless where used the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part.

[ 2024 c 164 s 201.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—2024 c 164: "This act is intended to make technical amendments to certain codified statutes that involve campaign disclosure and contribution. Any statutory changes made by this act should be interpreted as technical in nature and not interpreted to have any substantive, policy implications." [ 2024 c 164 s 101.]

Rules remain valid—2024 c 164: "A rule adopted under authority provided in chapter 42.17A RCW remains valid and is not affected by the recodification in this act." [ 2024 c 164 s 102.]

Effective date—2024 c 164: "This act takes effect January 1, 2026." [ 2024 c 164 s 536.]